Hawaii statutes.
[§508D-10.5] Energy-efficiency
consumer information in sale or lease of real property. Prior to the sale
of residential real property, the property owner shall make a good faith
declaration of electricity cost based on the most recent three-month period in
which the property was occupied prior to the date of the seller's disclosure,
pursuant to chapter 508D. This declaration shall only apply where the owner
directly pays the electrical utility bills, and shall not apply in the case of
a foreclosure of residential real property or where there are no electrical
utility accounts associated with the property. [L 2009, c 155, pt of §11]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next